Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-406
Campus buildings and facilities; revenue bonds; proceeds; use.

The proceeds of bonds provided for in sections 85-403 to 85-411, shall be used solely for the purpose for which they are issued and the expense of issuance of the revenue bonds in connection therewith.

Laws 1955, c. 352, § 4, p. 1077.